Colorado statutes. TITLE 42 VEHICLES AND TRAFFIC
PART 5
SIZE - WEIGHT - LOAD

Cross references:

For penalties for class A and class B traffic infractions, see § 42-4-1701 (3)(a)(I).

42-4-501. Size and weight violations - penalty.

Except as provided in section 42-4-509, it is a traffic infraction for any person to drive or move or for the owner to cause or knowingly permit to be driven or moved on any highway any vehicle or vehicles of a size or weight exceeding the limitations stated in sections 42-4-502 to 42-4-512 or otherwise in violation of said sections or section 42-4-1407, except as permitted in section 42-4-510. The maximum size and weight of vehicles specified in said sections shall be lawful throughout this state, and local authorities shall have no power or authority to alter said limitations, except as express authority may be granted in section 42-4-106.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2326, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 97:

Entire section amended, p. 1031, § 65, effective August 6.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-4-401 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-4-501 was relocated to § 42-4-104.

42-4-502. Width of vehicles.

The total outside width of any vehicle or the load thereon shall not exceed eight feet six inches, except as otherwise provided in this section.

A load of loose hay, including loosely bound, round bales, whether horse drawn or by motor, shall not exceed twelve feet in width.

A vehicle and trailer may transport a load of rectangular hay bales if such vehicle and load do not exceed ten feet six inches in width.

It is unlawful for any person to operate a vehicle or a motor vehicle which has attached thereto in any manner any chain, rope, wire, or other equipment which drags, swings, or projects in any manner so as to endanger the person or property of another.

The total outside width of buses and coaches used for the transportation of passengers shall not exceed eight feet six inches.

The total outside width of vehicles as included in this section shall not be construed so as to prohibit the projection beyond such width of clearance lights, rearview mirrors, or other accessories required by federal, state, or city laws or regulations.

The width requirements imposed by subsection (1) of this section shall not include appurtenances on recreational vehicles, including but not limited to motor homes, travel trailers, fifth wheel trailers, camping trailers, recreational park trailers, multipurpose trailers, and truck campers, all as defined in section 24-32-902, C.R.S., so long as such recreational vehicle, including such appurtenances, does not exceed a total outside width of nine feet six inches.

Any person who violates any provision of this section commits a class B traffic infraction.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2327, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2002:

(2)(b) and (5) amended, p. 404, § 1, effective August 7.

L. 2008:

(5)(b) amended, p. 638, § 4, effective August 5.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-4-402 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-4-502 was relocated to § 42-4-601.

Cross references:

For the definition of "multipurpose trailers", see § 42-1-102.

42-4-503. Projecting loads on passenger vehicles.

Except with regard to the operation of a motorcycle, bicycle, electrical assisted bicycle, or electric scooter, a person shall not operate a passenger-type vehicle on any highway with any load carried on the vehicle extending beyond the line of the fenders on the left side of the vehicle nor extending more than six inches beyond the line of the fenders on the right side of the vehicle. A person who violates this section commits a class B traffic infraction.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2327, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2009:

Entire section amended, (HB 09-1026), ch. 281, p. 1277, § 51, effective October 1.

L. 2019:

Entire section amended, (HB 19-1221), ch. 271, p. 2561, § 8, effective May 23.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-4-403 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-4-503 was relocated to § 42-4-602.

42-4-504. Height and length of vehicles.

A driver shall not drive a vehicle either unladen or with load that exceeds a height of fourteen feet six inches. The department of transportation shall designate highways with overhead highway structures that have less than fourteen feet six inches of vertical clearance. A driver shall not drive a vehicle under a structure if the vehicle's height exceeds the department's designated vertical clearance for the structure.

No single motor vehicle shall exceed a length of forty-five feet extreme overall dimension, inclusive of front and rear bumpers. The length of vehicles used for the mass transportation of passengers wholly within the limits of a town, city, or municipality or within a radius of fifteen miles thereof may extend to sixty feet. The length of school buses may extend to forty feet.

Buses used for the transportation of passengers between towns, cities, and municipalities in the state of Colorado may be sixty feet extreme overall length, inclusive of front and rear bumpers but shall not exceed a height of thirteen feet six inches, if such buses are equipped to conform with the load and weight limitations set forth in section 42-4-508; except that buses with a height of fourteen feet six inches which otherwise conform to the requirements of this subsection (3) shall be operated only on highways designated by the department of transportation.

No combination of vehicles coupled together shall consist of more than four units, and no such combination of vehicles shall exceed a total overall length of seventy feet. Said length limitation shall not apply to unladen truck tractor-semitrailer combinations when the semitrailer is fifty-seven feet four inches or less in length or to unladen truck tractor-semitrailer-trailer combinations when the semitrailer and the trailer are each twenty-eight feet six inches or less in length. Said length limitations shall also not apply to vehicles operated by a public utility when required for emergency repair of public service facilities or properties or when operated under special permit as provided in section 42-4-510, but, in respect to night transportation, every such vehicle and the load thereon shall be equipped with a sufficient number of clearance lamps on both sides and marker lamps upon the extreme ends of any projecting load to clearly mark the dimensions of such load.

(4.5) Notwithstanding subsection (4) of this section, drivers shall not drive the following combinations of vehicles:

Saddlemount combinations consisting of more than four units or saddlemount combinations exceeding ninety-seven feet in overall length;

Laden truck tractor-semitrailer combinations exceeding seventy-five feet in overall length;

Stinger-steered vehicle combinations for transporting automobiles or boats and whose total overall length exceeds eighty feet; except that the overall length of these combinations excludes:

Safety devices that are not designed or used for carrying cargo;

Automobiles or boats being transported;

Any extension device that may be used for loading beyond the extreme front or rear ends of a vehicle or combination of vehicles; except that the projection of a load, including any extension devices loaded to the front of the vehicle, must not extend more than four feet beyond the extreme front of the grille of the vehicle and the load or extension device must not extend more than six feet beyond the extreme rear of the vehicle; and

Towaway trailer transporter combinations that:

Exceed eighty-two feet in overall length;

Carry property;

Exceed an overall weight of twenty-six thousand pounds;

Consist of more than a single towing unit and two trailers or semitrailers; or

Do not constitute inventory property of a manufacturer, distributor, or dealer of the trailer or semitrailer.

The load upon any vehicle operated alone or the load upon the front vehicle of a combination of vehicles shall not extend beyond the front wheels of such vehicles or vehicle or the front most point of the grille of such vehicle; but a load may project not more than four feet beyond the front most point of the grille assembly of the vehicle engine compartment of such a vehicle at a point above the cab of the driver's compartment so long as that part of any load projecting ahead of the rear of the cab or driver's compartment shall be so loaded as not to obscure the vision of the driver to the front or to either side.

The length limitations of vehicles and combinations of vehicles provided for in this section as they apply to vehicles being operated and utilized for the transportation of steel, fabricated beams, trusses, utility poles, and pipes shall be determined without regard to the projection of said commodities beyond the extreme front or rear of the vehicle or combination of vehicles; except that the projection of a load to the front shall be governed by the provisions of subsection (5) of this section, and no load shall project to the rear more than ten feet.

Any person who violates any provision of this section commits a class B traffic infraction.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2327, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 95:

(4), (5), and (6) amended and (4.5) added, p. 471, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 2016:

(1) and (4.5) amended, (HB 16-1298), ch. 142, p. 421, § 1, effective August 10.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-4-404 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-4-504 was relocated to § 42-4-603.

42-4-505. Longer vehicle combinations - rules.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this article to the contrary, the department of transportation, in the exercise of its discretion, may issue permits for the use of longer vehicle combinations. An annual permit for such use may be issued to each qualified carrier company. The carrier company shall maintain a copy of such annual permit in each vehicle operating as a longer vehicle combination; except that, if a peace officer, as described in section 16-2.5-101, C.R.S., or an authorized agent of the department of transportation may determine that the permit can be electronically verified at the time of contact, a copy of the permit need not be in each vehicle. The fee for the permit shall be two hundred fifty dollars per year.

Notwithstanding the amount specified for the fee in paragraph (a) of this subsection (1), the executive director of the department by rule or as otherwise provided by law may reduce the amount of the fee if necessary pursuant to section 24-75-402 (3), C.R.S., to reduce the uncommitted reserves of the fund to which all or any portion of the fee is credited. After the uncommitted reserves of the fund are sufficiently reduced, the executive director of the department by rule or as otherwise provided by law may increase the amount of the fee as provided in section 24-75-402 (4), C.R.S.

The department shall provide the option to a company filing for a permit under this section to file an express consent waiver that enables the company to designate a company representative to be a party of interest for a violation of this section. The appearance of the company representative in a court hearing without the operator when the operator has signed such waiver shall not be deemed the practice of law in violation of article 93 of title 13.

The permits shall allow operation, over designated highways, of the following vehicle combinations of not more than three cargo units and neither fewer than six axles nor more than nine axles:

An unladen truck tractor, a semitrailer, and two trailers. A semitrailer used with a converter dolly shall be considered a trailer. Semitrailers and trailers shall be of approximately equal lengths not to exceed twenty-eight feet six inches in length.

An unladen truck tractor, a semitrailer, and a single trailer. A semitrailer used with a converter dolly shall be considered a trailer. Semitrailers and trailers shall be of approximately equal lengths not to exceed forty-eight feet in length. Notwithstanding any other restriction set forth in this section, such combination may have up to eleven axles when used to transport empty trailers.

An unladen truck tractor, a semitrailer, and a single trailer, one trailer of which is not more than forty-eight feet long, the other trailer of which is not more than twenty-eight feet six inches long. A semitrailer used with a converter dolly shall be considered a trailer. The shorter trailer shall be operated as the rear trailer.

A truck and single trailer, having an overall length of not more than eighty-five feet, the truck of which is not more than thirty-five feet long and the trailer of which is not more than forty feet long. For the purposes of this paragraph (d), a semitrailer used with a converter dolly shall be considered a trailer.

The long combinations are limited to interstate highway 25, interstate highway 76, interstate highway 70 west of its intersection with state highway 13 in Garfield county, interstate highway 70 east of its intersection with U.S. 40 and state highway 26, the circumferential highways designated I-225 and I-270, and state highway 133 in Delta county from mile marker 8.9 to mile marker 9.7. The department of transportation shall promulgate rules to provide carriers with reasonable ingress to and egress from such designated highway segments.

Upon action by the congress of the United States to lift the freeze imposed by the federal "Intermodal Surface Transportation Efficiency Act of 1991", Pub.L. 102-240, as amended, concerning the use of longer vehicle combinations, either by the total freeze being lifted by congress or by the approval of pilot projects to expand the use of longer vehicle combinations by the states, the department of transportation shall undertake a process to evaluate both interstate and state highways for possible authorization by the department of additional highway segments for inclusion by the general assembly in paragraph (a) of this subsection (3). During the review process, the department shall solicit input from all relevant stakeholders and shall work within existing statutory and regulatory guidelines. The department shall commence the review process within ninety days after action by congress that would allow expansion of the longer vehicle combination route network in Colorado.

The department of transportation shall promulgate rules and regulations governing the issuance of the permits, including, but not limited to, selection of carriers, driver qualifications, equipment selection, hours of operation, and safety considerations; except that they shall not include hazardous materials subject to regulation by the provisions of article 20 of this title.

Any person who violates any provision of this section commits a class B traffic infraction.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2329, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 95:

(2)(a) to (2)(c) amended, p. 473, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 98:

(1) amended, p. 1358, § 113, effective June 1; (2)(b) amended, p. 1095, § 7, effective June 1.

L. 2003:

(1)(a) amended, p. 581, § 1, effective January 1, 2004.

L. 2004:

(1)(a) amended, p. 1211, § 100, effective August 4.

L. 2006:

(1)(c) added, p. 309, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2011:

(3) amended, (HB 11-1192), ch. 111, p. 344, § 1, effective August 10.

L. 2017:

(1)(c) amended, (SB 17-227), ch. 192, p. 705, § 7, effective August 9.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-4-404.5 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-4-505 was relocated to § 42-4-604.

42-4-506. Trailers and towed vehicles.

When one vehicle is towing another, the drawbar or other connection shall be of sufficient strength to pull all weight towed thereby, and said drawbar or other connection shall not exceed fifteen feet from one vehicle to the other, except the connection between any two vehicles transporting poles, pipe, machinery, or other objects of a structural nature which cannot readily be dismembered and except connections between vehicles in which the combined lengths of the vehicles and the connection does not exceed an overall length of fifty-five feet and the connection is of rigid construction included as part of the structural design of the towed vehicle.

When one vehicle is towing another and the connection consists of a chain, rope, or cable, there shall be displayed upon such connection a white flag or cloth not less than twelve inches square.

Whenever one vehicle is towing another, in addition to the drawbar or other connection, except a fifth wheel connection meeting the requirements of the department of transportation, safety chains or cables arranged in such a way that it will be impossible for the vehicle being towed to break loose from the vehicle towing in the event the drawbar or other connection were to be broken, loosened, or otherwise damaged shall be used. This subsection (3) shall apply to all motor vehicles, to all trailers, except semitrailers connected by a proper fifth wheel, and to any dolly used to convert a semitrailer to a full trailer.

Any person who violates any provision of this section commits a class B traffic infraction.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2330, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-4-405 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-4-506 was relocated to § 42-4-605.

42-4-507. Wheel and axle loads.

The gross weight upon any wheel of a vehicle shall not exceed the following:

When the wheel is equipped with a solid rubber or cushion tire, eight thousand pounds;

When the wheel is equipped with a pneumatic tire, nine thousand pounds.

The gross weight upon any single axle or tandem axle of a vehicle shall not exceed the following:

When the wheels attached to said axle are equipped with solid rubber or cushion tires, sixteen thousand pounds;

Except as provided in paragraph (b.5) of this subsection (2), when the wheels attached to a single axle are equipped with pneumatic tires, twenty thousand pounds;

When the wheels attached to a single axle are equipped with pneumatic tires and the vehicle or vehicle combination is a digger derrick or bucket boom truck operated by an electric utility on a highway that is not on the interstate system as defined in section 43-2-101 (2), C.R.S., twenty-one thousand pounds;

When the wheels attached to a tandem axle are equipped with pneumatic tires, thirty-six thousand pounds for highways on the interstate system and forty thousand pounds for highways not on the interstate system.

Vehicles equipped with a self-compactor and used solely for the transporting of trash are exempted from the provisions of paragraph (b) of subsection (2) of this section.

After January 1, 1987, the provisions of this subsection (3) shall be reviewed at a joint meeting of the senate transportation committee and the house transportation and energy committee in order to determine the effects of such provisions.

A vehicle contracted by or owned and operated by a city, county, municipal utility, or special district is exempt from paragraph (c) of subsection (2) of this section if the vehicle:

Is equipped with a vacuum or jet equipment to load or unload solid, semisolid, or liquid waste for water or wastewater treatment or transportation systems or for the removal of storm water; and

Is not operated on the interstate system as defined by section 43-2-101, C.R.S.

For the purposes of this section:

A single axle is defined as all wheels, whose centers may be included within two parallel transverse vertical planes not more than forty inches apart, extending across the full width of the vehicle.

A tandem axle is defined as two or more consecutive axles, the centers of which may be included between parallel vertical planes spaced more than forty inches and not more than ninety-six inches apart, extending across the full width of the vehicle.

The gross weight upon any one wheel of a steel-tired vehicle shall not exceed five hundred pounds per inch of cross-sectional width of tire.

Any person who drives a vehicle or owns a vehicle in violation of any provision of this section commits a class 2 misdemeanor traffic offense.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2330, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 96:

(2)(b) amended and (2)(b.5) added, p. 629, § 3, effective January 1, 1997.

L. 2003:

(2)(b.5) amended, p. 670, § 1, effective March 20.

L. 2014:

(3)(c) added, (HB 14-1160), ch. 97, p. 352, § 1, effective August 6.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-4-406 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-4-507 was relocated to § 42-4-606.

42-4-508. Gross weight of vehicles and loads - definition.

Except as provided in subsection (1.5) of this section, a person shall not move or operate a vehicle or combination of vehicles on any highway or bridge when the gross weight upon any one axle of a vehicle exceeds the limits prescribed in section 42-4-507.

Subject to the limitations prescribed in section 42-4-507, the maximum gross weight of any vehicle or combination of vehicles shall not exceed that determined by the formula W = 1,000 (L + 40), where W represents the gross weight in pounds and L represents the length in feet between the centers of the first and last axles of such vehicle or combination of vehicles; except that, in computation of this formula, the gross vehicle weight must not exceed eighty-five thousand pounds. For the purposes of this section, where a combination of vehicles is used, a vehicle must not carry a gross weight of less than ten percent of the overall gross weight of the combination of vehicles; except that these limitations shall not apply to specialized trailers of fixed public utilities whose axles may carry less than ten percent of the weight of the combination. The limitations provided in this section must be strictly construed and enforced.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this section, except as may be authorized under section 42-4-510, a person shall not move or operate a vehicle or combination of vehicles on any highway or bridge that is part of the national system of interstate and defense highways, also known as the interstate system, when the gross weight of such vehicle or combination of vehicles exceeds the amount determined by the formula W = 500 [(LN/N-1) + 12N + 36], up to a maximum of eighty thousand pounds, where W represents the overall gross weight on any group of two or more consecutive axles to the nearest five hundred pounds, L represents the distance in feet between the extreme of any group of two or more consecutive axles, and N represents the number of axles in the group.

For the purposes of this subsection (1), where a combination of vehicles is used, a vehicle must not carry a gross weight of less than ten percent of the overall gross weight of the combination of vehicles; except that this limitation does not apply to specialized trailers whose specific use is to haul poles and whose axles may carry less than ten percent of the weight of the combination.

(1.5) The gross weight limits provided in subsection (1) of this section increase, but by no more than two thousand pounds, for any vehicle or combination of vehicles if the vehicle or combination of vehicles contains an alternative fuel system and operates on alternative fuel or both alternative and conventional fuel. For the purposes of this subsection (1.5), "alternative fuel" has the same meaning provided in section 24-30-1104 (2)(c)(III)(A).

The department upon registering any vehicle under the laws of this state, which vehicle is designed and used primarily for the transportation of property or for the transportation of ten or more persons, may acquire such information and may make such investigation or tests as necessary to enable it to determine whether such vehicle may safely be operated upon the highways in compliance with all the provisions of this article. The department shall not register any such vehicle for a permissible gross weight exceeding the limitations set forth in sections 42-4-501 to 42-4-512 and 42-4-1407. Every such vehicle shall meet the following requirements:

It shall be equipped with brakes as required in section 42-4-223;

Every motor vehicle to be operated outside of business and residence districts shall have motive power adequate to propel at a reasonable speed such vehicle and any load thereon or to be drawn thereby.

If the federal highway administration or the United States congress prescribes or adopts vehicle size or weight limits greater than those now prescribed by the "Federal-Aid Highway Act of 1956", which limits exceed in full or in part the provisions of section 42-4-504 or paragraph (b) or (c) of subsection (1) of this section, the transportation commission, upon determining that Colorado highways have been constructed to standards which will accommodate such additional size or weight and that the adoption of said size and weight limitations will not jeopardize any distribution of federal highway funds to the state, may adopt size and weight limits comparable to those prescribed or adopted by the federal highway administration or the United States congress and may authorize said limits to be used by owners or operators of vehicles while said vehicles are using highways within this state; but no vehicle size or weight limit so adopted by the commission shall be less in any respect than those now provided for in section 42-4-504 or paragraph (b) or (c) of subsection (1) of this section.

Any person who drives a vehicle or owns a vehicle in violation of any provision of this section commits a class 2 misdemeanor traffic offense.

Source:

L. 94:

(1)(c)(III)(B) amended, p. 304, § 3, effective March 22; entire title amended with relocations, p. 2331, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 96:

IP(1) amended and (1.5) added, p. 630, § 4, effective January 1, 1997.

L. 2009:

(1)(b) amended, (SB 09-108), ch. 5, p. 51, § 8, effective January 1, 2010; (1)(b) amended, (HB 09-1318), ch. 316, p. 1703, § 1, effective January 1, 2010.

L. 2013:

(1) amended, (HB 13-1132), ch. 60, p. 197, § 1, effective March 22.

L. 2016:

(1.5) amended, (HB 16-1298), ch. 142, p. 422, § 2, effective August 10.

L. 2020:

(1.5) amended, (HB 20-1167), ch. 56, p. 192, § 5, effective September 14.

42-4-509. Vehicles weighed - excess removed.

Any police or peace officer, as described in section 16-2.5-101, C.R.S., having reason to believe that the weight of a vehicle and load is unlawful is authorized to require the driver to stop and submit to a weighing of the same by means of either portable or stationary scales or shall require that such vehicle be driven to the nearest public scales in the event such scales are within five miles.

Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection (2), whenever an officer upon weighing a vehicle and load as provided in subsection (1) of this section determines that the weight is unlawful, such officer shall require the driver to stop the vehicle in a suitable place and remain standing until such portion of the load is removed as may be necessary to reduce the gross weight of such vehicle to such limit as permitted under sections 42-4-501 to 42-4-512 and 42-4-1407. All material so unloaded shall be cared for by the owner or operator of such vehicle at the risk of such owner or operator.

Whenever an officer upon weighing a vehicle and load as provided in subsection (1) of this section determines that the weight is unlawful and the load consists solely of either explosives or hazardous materials as defined in section 42-1-102 (32), such officer shall permit the driver of such vehicle to proceed to the driver's destination without requiring the driver to unload the excess portion of such load.

Any driver of a vehicle who fails or refuses to stop and submit the vehicle and load to a weighing or who fails or refuses when directed by an officer upon a weighing of the vehicle to stop the vehicle and otherwise comply with the provisions of this section commits a class 2 misdemeanor traffic offense.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2333, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2003:

(1) amended, p. 1628, § 61, effective August 6.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-4-408 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-4-509 was relocated to § 42-4-608.